Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-454
Permit to hunt deer, antelope, or elk; issued to disabled person; limitation.

A permit issued to a disabled person to hunt deer, antelope, or elk shall not have a limitation regarding the sex of such animal unless, for management purposes, the commission determines that all permits issued in the management unit in which the application for a permit is made shall have a limitation regarding the sex of the animal.

Laws 1994, LB 1088, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-215.04;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 164.